dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX i1 Y 45
SFX i1 enir enir/n'q'd'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enant/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enu/q' enir
SFX i1 enir iens/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iens/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir ient/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enons/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir enez/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir iennent/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enais/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir enais/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir enait/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enions/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir eniez/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir enaient/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir ins/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir ins/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir int/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir inmes/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir intes/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir inrent/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrai/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendras/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendra/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrons/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrez/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir iendront/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrais/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrais/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrait/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir iendrions/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir iendriez/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir iendraient/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir ienne/n'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir iennes/n'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir ienne/n'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir enions/n'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir eniez/n'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir iennent/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir insse/n'q'j'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir insses/n'q'l'm't' enir
SFX i1 enir int/n'q'l'm't's' enir
SFX i1 enir inssions/n'q'l't' enir
SFX i1 enir inssiez/n'q'l'm' enir
SFX i1 enir inssent/n'q'l'm't's' enir

SFX i2 Y 45
SFX i2 enir enir/m't's' enir
SFX i2 enir enant/m't's' enir
SFX i2 enir enu enir
SFX i2 enir iens/m' enir
SFX i2 enir iens/t' enir
SFX i2 enir ient/s' enir
SFX i2 enir enons enir
SFX i2 enir enez enir
SFX i2 enir iennent/s' enir
SFX i2 enir enais/m' enir
SFX i2 enir enais/t' enir
SFX i2 enir enait/s' enir
SFX i2 enir enions enir
SFX i2 enir eniez enir
SFX i2 enir enaient/s' enir
SFX i2 enir ins/m' enir
SFX i2 enir ins/t' enir
SFX i2 enir int/s' enir
SFX i2 enir inmes enir
SFX i2 enir intes enir
SFX i2 enir inrent/s' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrai/m' enir
SFX i2 enir iendras/t' enir
SFX i2 enir iendra/s' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrons enir
SFX i2 enir iendrez enir
SFX i2 enir iendront/s' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrais/m' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrais/t' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrait/s' enir
SFX i2 enir iendrions enir
SFX i2 enir iendriez enir
SFX i2 enir iendraient/s' enir
SFX i2 enir ienne/m' enir
SFX i2 enir iennes/t' enir
SFX i2 enir ienne/s' enir
SFX i2 enir enions enir
SFX i2 enir eniez enir
SFX i2 enir iennent/s' enir
SFX i2 enir insse/m' enir
SFX i2 enir insses/t' enir
SFX i2 enir int/s' enir
SFX i2 enir inssions enir
SFX i2 enir inssiez enir
SFX i2 enir inssent/s' enir

SFX i5 N 45
SFX i5 tir tir tir
SFX i5 tir tant tir
SFX i5 tir ti tir
SFX i5 tir s tir
SFX i5 tir s tir
SFX i5 tir t tir
SFX i5 tir tons tir
SFX i5 tir tez tir
SFX i5 tir tent tir
SFX i5 tir tais tir
SFX i5 tir tais tir
SFX i5 tir tait tir
SFX i5 tir tions tir
SFX i5 tir tiez tir
SFX i5 tir taient tir
SFX i5 tir tis tir
SFX i5 tir tis tir
SFX i5 tir tit tir
SFX i5 tir times tir
SFX i5 tir tites tir
SFX i5 tir tirent tir
SFX i5 tir tirai tir
SFX i5 tir tiras tir
SFX i5 tir tira tir
SFX i5 tir tirons tir
SFX i5 tir tirez tir
SFX i5 tir tiront tir
SFX i5 tir tirais tir
SFX i5 tir tirais tir
SFX i5 tir tirait tir
SFX i5 tir tirions tir
SFX i5 tir tiriez tir
SFX i5 tir tiraient tir
SFX i5 tir te tir
SFX i5 tir tes tir
SFX i5 tir te tir
SFX i5 tir tions tir
SFX i5 tir tiez tir
SFX i5 tir tent tir
SFX i5 tir tisse tir
SFX i5 tir tisses tir
SFX i5 tir tit tir
SFX i5 tir tissions tir
SFX i5 tir tissiez tir
SFX i5 tir tissent tir

SFX i+ Y 6
SFX i+ enir enus/q' enir
SFX i+ enir enue/q' enir
SFX i+ enir enues/q' enir
SFX i+ tir tis/q' tir
SFX i+ tir tie/q' tir
SFX i+ tir ties/q' tir

SFX iA Y 17
SFX iA dvenir dvenir/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenant/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenu/q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvient/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenait/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvenaient/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvint/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvinrent/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendra/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendront/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendrait/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviendraient/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvienne/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/n'q' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvint/n'q'm't' venir
SFX iA dvenir dvinssent/n'q' venir

SFX iB Y 48
SFX iB partenir partenir/n'q'd'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenant/n'q'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenu/q' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiens/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiens/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partient/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenons/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiennent/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenais/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenais/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenait/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenions/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir parteniez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenaient/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partins/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partins/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partint/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinmes/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partintes/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinrent/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrai/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendras/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendra/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrons/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendront/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrait/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendrions/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendriez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiendraient/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partienne/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiennes/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partienne/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenions/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir parteniez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiennent/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinsse/n'j'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinsses/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partint/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssions/n't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssiez/n'm' tenir
SFX iB partenir partinssent/n'm't's' tenir
SFX iB partenir partiens/n'm't' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenons/n' tenir
SFX iB partenir partenez/n'm' tenir
