dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abstenir/i2i+()
advenir/iA()
appartenir/iB()
circonvenir/i0i+()
consentir/i5i+()
contenir/i0i+()
contrevenir/i0i+()
convenir/i0i+()
dementir/i5i+()
departir/i5i+()
detenir/i0i+()
devenir/i0i+()
disconvenir/i0i+()
entretenir/i1i+()
intervenir/i0i+()
maintenir/i0i+()
mentir/i5i+()
obtenir/i1i+()
obvenir/i0i+()
partir/i5i+()
parvenir/i0i+()
pressentir/i5i+()
prevenir/i0i+()
provenir/i0i+()
redevenir/i0i+()
repartir/i5i+()
repentir/i5i+()
ressentir/i5i+()
ressortir/i5i+()
ressouvenir/i0i+()
retenir/i0i+()
revenir/i0i+()
sentir/i5i+()
sortir/i5i+()
soutenir/i0i+()
souvenir/i0i+()
survenir/i0i+()
tenir/i0i+()
venir/i0i+()
